Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.060

Arrest and fingerprint form.

The arrest and fingerprint form shall include but not be limited to the following:

(1) Unique numbers associated with the arrest charges. The unique numbering system may be controlled by the local law enforcement agency, however the section shall approve of the numbering system and maintain a current catalog of approved local numbering systems. The purpose of the unique numbering system is to allow tracking of arrest charges through disposition;

(2) An organization code;

(3) Date of arrest;

(4) Local identification number;

(5) The prescribed fingerprints;

(6) Individual identification information and other information prescribed by the section.

[ 1984 c 17 s 6.]